pt-PT: Ocasião de prémios: Académico; Conquista; Reconhecimento do funcionário; Formatura; Evento desportivo; Outro
ja: 表彰場面: 学業; 目標達成; 社員表彰; 卒業; スポーツイベント; その他
en: Award occasion: Academic; Achievement; Employee recognition; Graduation; Sports event; Other
hr-HR: Prigoda dodjele nagrade: Akademski; Postignuće; Priznanje zaposlenika; Diplomiranje; Sportski događaj; Ostalo
fi: Palkitsemistilaisuus: Akateeminen; Saavutus; Työntekijän tunnustus; Valmistujaiset; Urheilutapahtuma; Muu
lt-LT: Apdovanojimo proga: Akademinis; Pasiekimas; Darbuotojų įvertinimas; Mokslų baigimas; Sporto renginys; Kita
hu: Díj célja: Tudományos; Teljesítmény; Munkavállaló elismerése; Érettségi/diplomaosztó; Sportesemény; Egyéb
da: Præmielejlighed: Akademisk; Præstation; Anerkendelse af medarbejdere; Eksamen; Sportsbegivenhed; Andet
pl: Okazja do nagrody: Akademia; Realizacja; Docenianie pracowników; Rozdanie dyplomów; Wydarzenie sportowe; Inne
vi: Dịp trao giải: Học thuật; Thành tích; Ghi nhận nhân viên; Tốt nghiệp; Sự kiện thể thao; Khác
es: Ocasión de premios: Académico; Logro; Reconocimiento al empleado; Graduación; Evento deportivo; Otros
de: Anlass des Preises: Akademisch; Leistung; Mitarbeiteranerkennung; Abschluss; Sportveranstaltung; Sonstiges
el: Περίσταση απονομής: Ακαδημαϊκό γεγονός; Επίτευγμα; Αναγνώριση εργαζόμενου; Αποφοίτηση; Αθλητική εκδήλωση; Άλλο
fr: Cérémonie de remise de prix: Académique; Réalisation; Reconnaissance des employés; Remise des diplômes; Événement sportif; Autre
it: Occasione della premiazione: Accademico; Risultato; Premio per i dipendenti; Laurea; Evento sportivo; Altro
nb: Utmerkelsesanledning: Akademisk; Oppnåelse; Anerkjennelse av ansatt; Fullførte studier; Idrettsarrangement; Annet
ro-RO: Ocazie acordare premiu: Academic; Realizare; Recunoașterea angajaților; Absolvire; Eveniment sportiv; Altele
ru: Повод для награждения: Академический; Достижение; Поощрение сотрудников; Выпускной; Спортивное мероприятие; Другое
nl: Awardgelegenheid: Academisch; Prestatie; Erkenning van medewerkers; Diploma-uitreiking; Sportevenement; Andere
sv: Pristillfälle: Academisk; Prestation; Erkännande av anställda; Examen; Sportevenemang; Övrigt
zh-CN: 颁奖场合: 学术; 成就; 员工认可; 毕业; 体育项目; 其他
sk-SK: Udalosť spojená s ocenením: Akademický; Úspech; Uznanie zamestnanca; Promócie; Športové podujatie; Iné
zh-TW: 頒獎場合: 學術; 成就; 員工認可; 畢業; 體育賽事; 其他
sl-SI: Priložnost za podelitev nagrade: Akademsko; Dosežek; Priznanje zaposlenih; Diplomiranje; Športni dogodek; Drugo
cs: Příležitost k ocenění: Akademická; Úspěch; Ocenění zaměstnanců; Promoce; Sportovní událost; Jiné
pt-BR: Ocasião de premiação: Acadêmico; Conquista; Reconhecimento dos funcionários; Formatura; Evento esportivo; Outro
tr: Ödül olayı: Akademik; Başarı; Çalışan tanıma; Mezuniyet; Spor etkinliği; Diğer
bg-BG: Повод за награждаване: Академичен; Постижение; Признание на служителите; Дипломиране; Спортно събитие; Други
th: โอกาสรับรางวัล: เชิงวิชาการ; ประสบความสำเร็จ; การให้ความสำคัญกับพนักงาน; สำเร็จการศึกษา; กิจกรรมกีฬา; อื่นๆ
ko: 시상식: 학술; 성취; 직원 표창; 졸업; 스포츠 이벤트; 기타